Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$21,084,201 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Oregon State
Board of Nursing.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House May 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 7, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5022 (HB 5022-A) Page 1